dev/proper-noun/proper-noun.ne.dix
  <!-- कलकत्ता; कलकत्ता; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कलकत्ता__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विराटनगर; विराटनगर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विराटनगर__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पञ्चनारायण; पञ्चनारायण; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पञ्चनारायण__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भारत; भारत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भारत__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- माओ; माओ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="माओ__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सागर; सागर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सागर__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बिराटनगर; बिराटनगर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बिराटनगर__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कार्की; कार्की; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कार्की__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रतीक; प्रतीक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रतीक__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गण्डकी; गण्डकी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गण्डकी__np_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बर्दिया; बर्दिया; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बर्दिया__np_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जंगबहादुर; जंगबहादुर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जंगबहादुर__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रामदल; रामदल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रामदल__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गाँधी; गाँधी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गाँधी__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चन्द; चन्द; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चन्द__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- किम्बु; किम्बु; 1 -->
    <pardef n="किम्बु__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पार्वती; पार्वती; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पार्वती__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- राणा; राणा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="राणा__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नेपालगंज; नेपालगंज; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नेपालगंज__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उपाध्याय; उपाध्याय; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उपाध्याय__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दुर्गा; दुर्गा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दुर्गा__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- शमशेर; शमशेर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="शमशेर__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- युरोप; युरोप; 1 -->
    <pardef n="युरोप__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भास्करजी; भास्करजी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भास्करजी__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जोशी; जोशी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जोशी__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नुवाकोट; नुवाकोट; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नुवाकोट__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कंसाकार; कंसाकार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कंसाकार__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- काशी; काशी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="काशी__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कृष्णप्रसाद; कृष्णप्रसाद; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कृष्णप्रसाद__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पाण्डव; पाण्डव; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पाण्डव__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कुमार; कुमार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कुमार__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विष्णु; विष्णु; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विष्णु__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पाँडे; पाँडे; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पाँडे__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- महेश; महेश; 1 -->
    <pardef n="महेश__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- इराक; इराक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="इराक__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मिथिला; मिथिला; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मिथिला__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हुतराज; हुतराज; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हुतराज__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="कलकत्ता"><i>कलकत्ता</i><par n="कलकत्ता__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="विराटनगर"><i>विराटनगर</i><par n="विराटनगर__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="पञ्चनारायण"><i>पञ्चनारायण</i><par n="पञ्चनारायण__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="भारत"><i>भारत</i><par n="भारत__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="माओ"><i>माओ</i><par n="माओ__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="सागर"><i>सागर</i><par n="सागर__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="बिराटनगर"><i>बिराटनगर</i><par n="बिराटनगर__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="कार्की"><i>कार्की</i><par n="कार्की__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रतीक"><i>प्रतीक</i><par n="प्रतीक__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="गण्डकी"><i>गण्डकी</i><par n="गण्डकी__np_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="बर्दिया"><i>बर्दिया</i><par n="बर्दिया__np_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="जंगबहादुर"><i>जंगबहादुर</i><par n="जंगबहादुर__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="रामदल"><i>रामदल</i><par n="रामदल__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="गाँधी"><i>गाँधी</i><par n="गाँधी__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="चन्द"><i>चन्द</i><par n="चन्द__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="किम्बु"><i>किम्बु</i><par n="किम्बु__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="पार्वती"><i>पार्वती</i><par n="पार्वती__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="राणा"><i>राणा</i><par n="राणा__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="नेपालगंज"><i>नेपालगंज</i><par n="नेपालगंज__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="उपाध्याय"><i>उपाध्याय</i><par n="उपाध्याय__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="दुर्गा"><i>दुर्गा</i><par n="दुर्गा__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="शमशेर"><i>शमशेर</i><par n="शमशेर__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="युरोप"><i>युरोप</i><par n="युरोप__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="भास्करजी"><i>भास्करजी</i><par n="भास्करजी__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="जोशी"><i>जोशी</i><par n="जोशी__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="नुवाकोट"><i>नुवाकोट</i><par n="नुवाकोट__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="कंसाकार"><i>कंसाकार</i><par n="कंसाकार__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="काशी"><i>काशी</i><par n="काशी__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="कृष्णप्रसाद"><i>कृष्णप्रसाद</i><par n="कृष्णप्रसाद__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="पाण्डव"><i>पाण्डव</i><par n="पाण्डव__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="कुमार"><i>कुमार</i><par n="कुमार__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="विष्णु"><i>विष्णु</i><par n="विष्णु__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="पाँडे"><i>पाँडे</i><par n="पाँडे__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="महेश"><i>महेश</i><par n="महेश__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="इराक"><i>इराक</i><par n="इराक__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="मिथिला"><i>मिथिला</i><par n="मिथिला__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="हुतराज"><i>हुतराज</i><par n="हुतराज__np_m_aa"/></e>
